Missouri, session 2026, SB930.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 376, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 376.1245, to read as
follows:
376.1245. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Anesthesia time", the period during which an
anesthesia practitioner is present with the patient,
starting when the anesthesia practitioner begins to prepare
the patient for anesthesia services in the operating room or
an equivalent area and ending when the anesthesia
practitioner is no longer furnishing anesthesia services to
the patient because the patient may be placed safely under
postoperative or postanesthesia care. The term "anesthesia
time" includes, if counted by the anesthesia practitioner,
blocks of time around an interruption in anesthesia time
provided the anesthesia practitioner is furnishing
continuous anesthesia care within the time periods around
the interruption;
(2) "Anesthesia time units", time units recognized
with appropriate time intervals that do not exceed fifteen
minutes in length for each interval and that, taken

SB 930 2
together, represent the total anesthesia time for a
particular anesthesia service;
(3) "Excepted benefit plan", the same meaning given to
the term in section 376.998;
(4) "Health benefit plan", the same meaning given to
the term in section 376.1350. The term "health benefit
plan" shall also include the Missouri consolidated health
care plan established under chapter 103;
(5) "Health carrier", the same meaning given to the
term in section 376.1350;
(6) "Payment of anesthesia services", an amount paid
for anesthesia services:
(a) Determined by using prevailing medical coding and
billing standards in the professional medical billing
community, such as the Current Procedural Terminology code
book published by the American Medical Association, the
Medicare Claims Processing Manual, or guidance from
nationally recognized anesthesia organizations; and
(b) Calculated as the product obtained by multiplying
the following together:
a. The sum of the base units for the appropriate
medical code plus anesthesia time units and modifying units;
and
b. An anesthesia conversion factor that is defined in
the individual contract between the health carrier or health
benefit plan and the anesthesia practitioner or group.
2. No health carrier or health benefit plan shall
establish, implement, or enforce any policy, practice, or
procedure that imposes a time limit for the payment of
anesthesia services provided during a medical or surgical
procedure.

SB 930 3
3. No health carrier or health benefit plan shall
establish, implement, or enforce any policy, practice, or
procedure that restricts or excludes all anesthesia time in
calculating the payment of anesthesia services.
4. Excepted benefit plans shall be subject to the
requirements of this section.
5. The provisions of this section shall apply to
health carriers that offer or issue health benefit plans
that are delivered, issued for delivery, continued, or
renewed in this state on or after August 28, 2026.
✓